Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 2. Power Cost Equalization Endowment Fund.

Cross references. —

For legislative authorization for the sale of the four dam pool, see sec. 15, ch. 60, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts, sec. 4, ch. 100, SLA 2004 in the 2004 Temporary and Special Acts, and sec. 1, ch. 31, SLA 2006, in the 2006 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 42.45.070.
Power cost equalization endowment fund established.

The power cost equalization endowment fund is established as a separate fund of the authority. The fund consists of

legislative appropriations to the fund that are not designated for annual expenditure for the purpose of power cost equalization;

accumulated earnings of the fund;

gifts, bequests, contributions of money and other assets, and federal money given to the fund that are not designated for annual expenditure for power cost equalization; and

[Repealed, § 13 ch 60 SLA 2000.]

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

[Repealed, § 13 ch 60 SLA 2000.]

History.

(§ 6 ch 60 SLA 2000; am §§ 7, 13 ch 60 SLA 2000)

Sec. 42.45.080.
Powers and duties of the commissioner of revenue.

The commissioner of revenue is the fiduciary of the fund. In managing the fund, the commissioner shall

have the same powers and duties as are provided in AS

37.10.071

; and

invest the fund in a manner likely to achieve at least a four percent nominal return over a five-year period to meet the objectives of the power cost equalization and rural electric capitalization fund (AS

42.45.100

).

In managing the fund, the commissioner shall

consider the status of the fund’s capital and the income generated on both current and probable future bases;

determine the appropriate investment objectives;

establish investment policies to achieve the objectives; and

act only in regard to the best financial interests of the fund.

On July 1 of each year, the commissioner shall determine

the monthly average market value of the fund for the previous three closed fiscal years; and

the earnings of the fund for the previous closed fiscal year.

History.

(§ 6 ch 60 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 2015; am § 1 ch 43 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 12, 2015, in (a)(2), substituted “a four percent nominal return over a five-year period to meet the objectives of the power cost equalization and rural electric capitalization fund (AS

42.45.100

)” for “a seven percent nominal return over time”.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 21, 2016, in (c), designated a portion of (c) as (1) and inserted “closed” prior to “fiscal years”; added (c)(2). Although the 2016 amendments were to have taken effect June 30, 2016 under § 4, ch. 43, SLA 2016, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2016, and so the actual effective date of the 2016 amendments was July 21, 2016, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 42.45.085.
Use of the power cost equalization endowment fund.

Five percent of the amount determined by the commissioner of revenue on July 1 of each year under AS

42.45.080(c)(1)

may be appropriated for the following purposes:

funding the power cost equalization and rural electric capitalization fund (AS

42.45.100

);

reimbursement to the Department of Revenue for the costs of establishing and managing the fund; and

reimbursement of other costs of administration of the fund.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

If the amount appropriated under (a) of this section is insufficient to achieve the purposes of (a)(1) - (3) of this section, the amount shall be prorated among the purposes listed in (a)(1) and (2) of this section.

If the earnings of the fund for the previous closed fiscal year, as calculated under AS

42.45.080(c)(2)

, exceed the appropriation under (a) of this section for the current fiscal year, the legislature may appropriate 70 percent of the difference between the earnings of the fund for the previous closed fiscal year, as calculated under AS

42.45.080(c)(2)

, and the appropriation made under (a) of this section for the current fiscal year as follows:

if the amount calculated under this subsection is less than $30,000,000, that amount to a community revenue sharing or community assistance fund; or

if the amount calculated under this subsection is $30,000,000 or more,

$30,000,000 to a community revenue sharing or community assistance fund; and

the remaining amount, not to exceed $25,000,000, to the renewable energy grant fund established under AS

42.45.045

, to the bulk fuel revolving loan fund established under AS

42.45.250

, or for rural power system upgrades or to a combination of the funds or purposes listed in this subparagraph.

History.

(§ 6 ch 60 SLA 2000; am §§
2, 3 ch 43 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For special appropriation amounts for fiscal years 2002 through the first fiscal year that begins after the closing date of the sale of the four dam pool, see § 14, ch. 60, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 21, 2016, in (a), substituted “Five percent” for “Seven percent” at the beginning, substituted AS “42.45.080(c)(1)” for “AS

42.45.080(c)

”, deleted “for the fiscal year beginning the following July 1” following “may be appropriated”; added (c) and (d). Although the 2016 amendments were to have taken effect June 30, 2016 under § 4, ch. 43, SLA 2016, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2016, and so the actual effective date of the 2016 amendments was July 21, 2016, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 42.45.099.
Definition.

In AS

42.45.070

—

42.45.099

, “fund” means the power cost equalization endowment fund established in AS

42.45.070

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 60 SLA 2000)